California statutes. Business and Professions Code
Notwithstanding any provision in the purchase contract to the contrary, if the subdivision is to be used for residential purposes, the subdivision public report shall disclose that a prospective buyer has the right to negotiate with the seller to permit inspections of the property by the buyer, or the buyer’s designee, under terms mutually agreeable to the prospective buyer and seller.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 307, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

11011.

(a) The commissioner may by regulation prescribe filing fees in connection with applications to the Department of Real Estate pursuant to this chapter and if the commissioner determines that lower fees are sufficient to offset the costs and expenses incurred in the administration of this chapter, may prescribe filing fees by regulation that are lower than the fees specified in subdivision (b). The commissioner shall hold at least one hearing each calendar year to determine if lower fees than those specified in subdivision (b) should be prescribed. At this hearing, the department shall report on the financial status of the department, including the revenues, expenditures, and reserves as of the end of the previous fiscal year. The department shall post a hearing notice 15 days in advance of the hearing that includes the required
 information about the financial status of the department.

(b) The filing fee for an application for a public report to be issued under authority of this chapter shall be set at the amount prescribed below and shall not exceed the maximum specified for each subdivision or phase of a subdivision in which interests are to be offered for sale or lease:

(1) A notice of intention without a completed questionnaire: Three hundred dollars ($300), not to exceed three hundred ninety dollars ($390).

(2) An original public report for subdivision interests described in Section 11004.5: Three thousand dollars ($3,000), not to exceed three thousand nine hundred dollars ($3,900), plus fifteen dollars ($15), not to exceed twenty dollars ($20), for each subdivision interest to be offered.

(3) An original public report for subdivision interests other than those described in Section 11004.5: One thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), not to exceed one thousand nine hundred fifty dollars ($1,950), plus fifteen dollars ($15), not to exceed twenty dollars ($20), for each subdivision interest to be offered.

(4) A conditional public report for subdivision interests described in Section 11004.5: One thousand dollars ($1,000), not to exceed one thousand three hundred dollars ($1,300).

(5) A conditional public report for subdivision interests other than those described in Section 11004.5: One thousand dollars ($1,000), not to exceed one thousand three hundred dollars ($1,300).

(6) A preliminary public report for subdivision interests described in
 Section 11004.5: Five hundred dollars ($500), not to exceed six hundred fifty dollars ($650).

(7) A preliminary public report for subdivision interests other than those described in Section 11004.5: Five hundred dollars ($500), not to exceed six hundred fifty dollars ($650).

(8) A renewal of an original public report for subdivision interests described in Section 11004.5: One thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), not to exceed one thousand nine hundred fifty dollars ($1,950). A renewal of a preliminary public report for subdivision interests described in Section 11004.5: Six hundred dollars ($600), not to exceed seven hundred eighty dollars ($780). A renewal of a conditional public report for subdivision interests described in Section 11004.5: One thousand dollars ($1,000), not to exceed one thousand three hundred dollars ($1,300).

(9) A renewal of an original or conditional public report for subdivision interests other than those described in Section 11004.5: One thousand dollars ($1,000), not to exceed one thousand three hundred dollars ($1,300). A renewal of a preliminary public report for subdivision interests other than those described in Section 11004.5: Six hundred dollars ($600), not to exceed seven hundred eighty dollars ($780).

(10) An amended original public report for subdivision interests described in Section 11004.5: One thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), not to exceed one thousand nine hundred fifty dollars ($1,950), plus fifteen dollars ($15), not to exceed twenty dollars ($20), for each subdivision interest to be offered under the amended original public report for which a fee has not previously been paid.

(11) An amended
 original public report to offer subdivision interests other than those described in Section 11004.5: One thousand dollars ($1,000), not to exceed one thousand three hundred dollars ($1,300), plus fifteen dollars ($15), not to exceed twenty dollars ($20), for each subdivision interest to be offered under the amended original public report for which a fee has not previously been paid.

(12) An amended preliminary public report for subdivision interests described in Section 11004.5 and for subdivision interests other than those described in Section 11004.5: Five hundred dollars ($500), not to exceed six hundred fifty dollars ($650), plus fifteen dollars ($15), not to exceed twenty dollars ($20), for each subdivision interest to be offered under the amended preliminary public report for which a fee has not previously been paid.

(13) An amended conditional public report for subdivision
 interests described in Section 11004.5 and for subdivision interests other than those described in Section 11004.5: One thousand dollars ($1,000), not to exceed one thousand three hundred dollars ($1,300), plus fifteen dollars ($15), not to exceed twenty dollars ($20), for each subdivision interest to be offered under the amended conditional public report for which a fee has not previously been paid.

(c) The filing fee to review a declaration as described in Section 11010.10 shall be five hundred dollars ($500), not to exceed six hundred fifty dollars ($650).

(d) The actual subdivision fees established by regulation under authority of this section and Section 10249.3 shall not exceed the amount reasonably required by the department to administer this part and Article 8 (commencing with Section 10249) of Chapter 3 of Part 1.

(e) All fees collected by the department under authority of this chapter shall be deposited into the Real Estate Fund under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 10450) of Part 1. All fees received by the department pursuant to this chapter shall be deemed earned upon receipt. No part of any fee is refundable unless the commissioner determines that it was paid as the result of a mistake or inadvertence.

This section shall remain in effect unless it is superseded pursuant to Section 10226 or subdivision (a) of Section 10226.5, whichever is applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 41, Sec. 15.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in the last paragraph.)
-------------------------------------------

11012.

It is unlawful for the owner, their agent, or subdivider, of the project, after it is submitted to the Department of Real Estate, to materially change the setup of that offering without first notifying the department in writing of the intended change. This section only applies to those changes of which the owner, their agent, or subdivider has knowledge or constructive knowledge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 33.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11013.

For the purposes of this part, a blanket encumbrance shall be considered to mean a trust deed or mortgage or any other lien or encumbrance, mechanics’ lien or otherwise, securing or evidencing the payment of money and affecting land to be subdivided or affecting more than one lot or parcel of subdivided land, or an agreement affecting more than one such lot or parcel by which the owner or subdivider holds said subdivision under an option, contract to sell, or trust agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1863.)
-------------------------------------------

11013.1.

It shall be unlawful, except as provided in Section 11013.2 or 11013.6, for the owner, subdivider, or agent to sell or lease lots or parcels within a subdivision that is subject to a blanket encumbrance unless there exists in the blanket encumbrance or other supplementary agreement a provision, hereinafter referred to as a release clause, which by its terms shall unconditionally provide that the purchaser or lessee of a lot or parcel can obtain legal title or other interest contracted for, free and clear of the blanket encumbrance, upon compliance with the terms and conditions of the purchase or lease.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 661, Sec. 2.   (AB 569)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

11013.2.

Should there not exist in the blanket encumbrance or supplementary agreement a release clause as set forth in Section 11013.1, then it shall be unlawful for the owner, subdivider, or agent to sell or lease lots or parcels within such subdivision unless one of the following conditions is complied with:

(a) The entire sum of money paid or advanced by the purchaser or lessee of any such lot or parcel, or such portion thereof as the commissioner shall determine is sufficient to protect the interest of the purchaser or lessee, shall be deposited into an escrow depository acceptable to the
 commissioner until either (1) a proper release is obtained from such blanket encumbrance; or (2) either the owner, subdivider, or agent or the purchaser or lessee may default under their contract of sale or lease and there is a determination as to the disposition of such moneys; or (3) the owner, subdivider, or agent orders the return of such moneys to such purchaser or lessee.

(b) The title to the subdivision is to be held in trust under an agreement of trust acceptable to the commissioner until a proper release from such blanket encumbrance is obtained.

(c) A bond to the State of California is furnished to the commissioner for the benefit and protection of purchasers or lessees of such lots or parcels, in such amount and subject to such terms as may be approved by the commissioner, which shall provide for the
 return of the moneys paid or advanced by any purchaser or lessee, for or on account of the purchase or lease of any such lot or parcel if a proper release from such blanket encumbrance is not obtained; provided, however, that if it should be determined that such purchaser or lessee, by reason of default or otherwise, is not entitled to the return of such moneys, or any portion thereof, then such bond shall be exonerated to the extent of the amount of such moneys to which such purchaser or lessee is not entitled.

(d) There is conformance to such other alternative requirement or method which the commissioner may deem acceptable to carry into effect the intent and provisions of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1335, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

11013.3.

Taxes and assessments levied by public authority shall not be considered a blanket encumbrance within the meaning of Section 11013.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1863.)
-------------------------------------------

11013.4.

If a subdivision is not subject to a blanket encumbrance, as defined in Section 11013, it is unlawful for the owner, subdivider, or agent to sell or lease lots or parcels within a subdivision unless one of the following conditions is complied with:

(a) The entire sum of money paid or advanced by the purchaser or lessee of any lot or parcel, or such portion thereof as the commissioner determines is sufficient to protect the interest of the purchaser or lessee, is deposited into an escrow depository acceptable to the commissioner or into a trust account acceptable to the commissioner to be
 held in the escrow depository or trust account until the legal title or other interest contracted for, whether title of record or other interest, is delivered to the purchaser or lessee or until (1) either the owner, subdivider, or agent or the purchaser or lessee defaults under the contract of sale or lease and a determination is made as to the disposition of the money; or (2) the owner, subdivider, or agent orders the return of the money to the purchaser or lessee.

(b) A bond to the State of California is furnished to the commissioner for the benefit and protection of purchasers or lessees of the lots or parcels, in such amount and subject to such terms as may be approved by the commissioner, which provides for the return of the money paid or advanced by any purchaser or lessee, for or on account of the purchase or lease of any lot or parcel in the event that the owner, subdivider, or agent does not, within the time specified in the contract
 to sell or lease, or any extension thereof, deliver the legal title or other interest contracted for, whether title of record or other interest, to the purchaser or lessee for any reason other than an uncured default of the purchaser or lessee.

(c) An association, approved by the commissioner, files with the commissioner a certificate in which it certifies that the owner, subdivider, or agent is a member of the association and that there is on file with the commissioner a bond, of the kind specified in subdivision (b), which has been approved by the commissioner as to amount, terms and coverage, and which is for the benefit and protection of all purchasers and lessees of subdivided lots or parcels to be sold or leased by members of the association (all which the commissioner may, at the commissioner’s option, verify or require to be verified).

(d) Proof, satisfactory to the
 commissioner, is furnished: (1) that security provided or contemplated to be given pursuant to the provisions of Section 66493 and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 66499) of Division 2 of Title 7 of the Government Code, has been given in an amount, the commissioner approves, or that the giving of such security is unnecessary; and (2) that a lien and completion bond or bonds, approved by the commissioner as to amount, terms and coverage and including within its scope all onsite construction work to be undertaken on the lots or parcels, has been written and issued by an admitted surety insurer; provided, however, that this subdivision applies only to an owner, subdivider, or agent who proposes to sell or lease the lots or parcels with improvements thereon in the nature of residential structures.

(e) The entire sums of moneys paid or advanced by the purchasers or lessees of the lots or parcels, or such portion of the money as the commissioner
 determines is sufficient to protect the interest of the purchaser or lessee, is deposited into an escrow depository or other agency, acceptable to the commissioner, to be held, in whole or in part, by the escrow depository or other agency as provided by subdivision (a) or, at the election of the owner, subdivider, or agent, to be disbursed, in whole or in part, for the construction of residential or other structures to be built on the lots or parcels within the subdivision, or such unit or units thereof as the commissioner determines, in such manner and pursuant to such instructions as the commissioner approves; provided, however, that the provisions of this subdivision apply only to an owner, subdivider, or agent who proposes to sell or lease the lots or parcels with improvements thereon in the nature of residential structures.

(f) There is conformance to such other alternative requirement or method the commissioner deems acceptable to carry
 into effect the intent and provisions of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 49.)
-------------------------------------------

11013.5.

The public report of the commissioner, when issued, shall indicate the method or procedure selected by the owner or subdivider to comply with the provisions of Sections 11013.1, 11013.2 or 11013.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1863.)
-------------------------------------------

11013.6.

Notwithstanding Sections 11013.1 and 11013.2, an individual interest in a stock cooperative, as defined in Section 4190 of the Civil Code, or a limited-equity housing cooperative, as defined in Section 817 of the Civil Code, may be sold or leased subject to a blanket encumbrance if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The notice required pursuant to Section 1133 of the Civil Code is provided to each prospective purchaser and lessee of the interest and is included in every purchase and lease contract.

(b) The property subject to the sale or lease has obtained a public report from the Department of Real Estate that accounts for the 
 blanket encumbrance.

(c) The governing documents for the association require the association to create and maintain during the term of the blanket encumbrance all of the following:

(1) Prior to the sale of any individual interests in the stock cooperative or limited-equity housing cooperative, a financing reserve amount equal to at least two months of the amount of the debt service payments due on the blanket encumbrance.

(2) Within one year of the sale of at least 25 percent of the individual interests in the stock cooperative or limited-equity housing cooperative, a financing reserve amount equal to at least three months of the amount of the debt service payments due on the blanket
 encumbrance.

(3) Within one year of the sale of at least 50 percent of the individual interests in the stock cooperative or limited-equity housing cooperative, a financing reserve amount equal to at least five months of the amount of the debt service payments due on the blanket encumbrance.

(4) Within one year of the sale of at least 75 percent of the individual interests in the stock cooperative or limited-equity housing cooperative, a financing reserve amount equal to at least eight months of the amount of the debt service payments due on the blanket encumbrance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 34.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11014.

The commissioner may investigate any subdivision being offered for sale or lease in this State. For the purposes of such investigations the commissioner may use and rely upon any relevant information or data concerning a subdivision obtained by him from the Federal Housing Administration, the United States Veterans Administration or any other federal agency having comparable duties and functions in relation to subdivisions or property therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1782.)
-------------------------------------------

11018.

The Real Estate Commissioner shall make an examination of any subdivision, and shall, unless there are grounds for denial, issue to the subdivider a public report authorizing the sale or lease in this state of the lots or parcels within the subdivision. The report shall contain the data obtained in accordance with Section 11010 and which the commissioner determines are necessary to implement the purposes of this article. The commissioner may publish the report.

The grounds for denial are:

(a) Failure to comply with any of the provisions in this chapter or the
 regulations of the commissioner pertaining thereto.

(b) The sale or lease would constitute misrepresentation to or deceit or fraud of the purchasers or lessees.

(c) Inability to deliver title or other interest contracted for.

(d) Inability to demonstrate that adequate financial arrangements have been made for all offsite improvements included in the offering.

(e) Inability to demonstrate that adequate financial arrangements have been made for any community, recreational or other facilities included in the offering. 

(f) Failure to make a showing that the parcels can be used for the purpose for which they are offered; and in the case of a subdivision being offered for residential purposes
 failure to make a showing that vehicular access and a source of potable domestic water either is available or will be available.

(g) Failure to provide in the contract or other writing the use or uses for which the parcels are offered, together with any covenants or conditions relative thereto.

(h) Agreements or bylaws to provide for management or other services pertaining to common facilities in the offering, which fail to comply with the regulations of the commissioner.

(i) Failure to demonstrate that adequate financial arrangements have been made for any guaranty or warranty included in the offering.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1686.)
-------------------------------------------

11018.1.

(a) A copy of the public report of the commissioner, when issued, shall be given to the prospective purchaser by the owner, subdivider, or agent prior to the execution of a binding contract or agreement for the sale or lease of any lot or parcel in a subdivision. The requirement of this section extends to lots or parcels offered by the subdivider after repossession. A receipt shall be taken from the prospective purchaser in a form and manner as set forth in regulations of the Real Estate Commissioner.

(b) A copy of the public report shall be given by the owner, subdivider, or agent at any time, upon oral or written request, to any member of the public. A copy of the public report and a statement advising that a copy of the public report may be obtained from the owner, subdivider or agent at any time, upon oral or written request, shall be posted in a conspicuous place at any office
 where sales or leases or offers to sell or lease lots within the subdivision are regularly made.

(c) At the same time that a public report is required to be given by the owner, subdivider, or agent pursuant to subdivision (a) with respect to a common interest development, as defined, in Section 4100 of the Civil Code, the owner, subdivider, or agent shall give the prospective purchaser a copy of the following statement: 

“Common Interest Development General Information

The project described in the attached Subdivision Public Report is known as a common-interest development. Read the public report carefully for more information about the type of development. The development
 includes common areas and facilities which will be owned or operated by an owners’ association. Purchase of a lot or unit automatically entitles and obligates you as a member of the association and, in most cases, includes a beneficial interest in the areas and facilities. Since membership in the association is mandatory, you should be aware of the following information before you purchase:

Your ownership in this development and your rights and remedies as a member of its association will be controlled by governing instruments which generally include a Declaration of Restrictions (also known as CC&Rs), Articles of Incorporation (or association), and bylaws. The provisions of these documents are intended to be, and in most cases are, enforceable in a court of law. Study these documents carefully before entering into a contract to purchase a subdivision interest.

In order to provide funds for operation and maintenance of
 the common facilities, the association will levy assessments against your lot or unit. If you are delinquent in the payment of assessments, the association may enforce payment through court proceedings or your lot or unit may be liened and sold through the exercise of a power of sale. The anticipated income and expenses of the association, including the amount that you may expect to pay through assessments, are outlined in the proposed budget. Ask to see a copy of the budget if the subdivider has not already made it available for your examination.

A homeowner association provides a vehicle for the ownership and use of recreational and other common facilities which were designed to attract you to buy in this development. The association also provides a means to accomplish architectural control and to provide a base for homeowner interaction on a variety of issues. The purchaser of an interest in a common-interest development should contemplate active participation in
 the affairs of the association. He or she should be willing to serve on the board of directors or on committees created by the board. In short, “they” in a common interest development is “you.” Unless you serve as a member of the governing board or on a committee appointed by the board, your control of the operation of the common areas and facilities is limited to your vote as a member of the association. There are actions that can be taken by the governing body without a vote of the members of the association which can have a significant impact upon the quality of life for association members.

Until there is a sufficient number of purchasers of lots or units in a common interest development to elect a majority of the governing body, it is likely that the subdivider will effectively control the affairs of the association. It is frequently necessary and equitable that the subdivider do so during the early stages of development. It is vitally important to the owners
 of individual subdivision interests that the transition from subdivider to resident-owner control be accomplished in an orderly manner and in a spirit of cooperation.

When contemplating the purchase of a dwelling in a common interest development, you should consider factors beyond the attractiveness of the dwelling units themselves. Study the governing instruments and give careful thought to whether you will be able to exist happily in an atmosphere of cooperative living where the interests of the group must be taken into account as well as the interests of the individual. Remember that managing a common interest development is very much like governing a small community ... the management can serve you well, but you will have to work for its success.”

Failure to provide the statement in accordance with this subdivision shall not be deemed a violation subject to Section 10185.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 181, Sec. 9.   (AB 806)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 86 of Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------

11018.2.

No person shall sell or lease, or offer for sale or lease in this state any lots or parcels in a subdivision without first obtaining a public report from the Real Estate Commissioner. This section shall not apply to subdivisions for which a notice of intention is not required under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1336, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

11018.3.

Any subdivider objecting to the denial of a public report may, within 30 days after receipt of the order of denial, file a written request for a hearing. The commissioner shall hold the hearing within 20 days thereafter unless the party requesting the hearing requests a postponement. If the hearing is not held within 20 days after request for a hearing is received plus the period of the postponement or if a proposed decision is not rendered within 45 days after submission and an order adopting or rejecting the proposed decision is not issued within 15 days
 thereafter, the order of denial shall be rescinded and a public report issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 11, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

11018.5.

With respect to the subdivisions and interests of the type described in Section 11004.5, and in addition to the other grounds for denial of a public report as set forth in this code, the commissioner shall issue a public report if the commissioner finds the following with respect to any such subdivision or interest:

(a) (1) Reasonable arrangements have been made to assure completion of the subdivision and all offsite improvements included in the offering.

(2) If the condominium or community apartment project, stock cooperative or planned development, or premises or facilities within the common area are not completed prior to the issuance of a final subdivision public report on the project, the subdivider shall specify a reasonable date for completion and shall comply with one of the following conditions:

(A) Arranges for lien and completion bond or bonds in an amount and subject to such terms, conditions and coverage as the commissioner may approve to assure completion of the improvements lien free.

(B) All funds from the sale of lots or parcels or such portions thereof as the commissioner shall determine are sufficient to assure construction of the improvement or improvements, shall be impounded in a neutral escrow depository acceptable to the commissioner until the
 improvements have been completed and all applicable lien periods have expired; provided, however, the commissioner determines the time for the completion is reasonable.

(C) An amount sufficient to cover the costs of construction shall be deposited in a neutral escrow depository acceptable to the commissioner under a written agreement providing for disbursements from that escrow as work is completed.

(D) If the project is a condominium situated on a single parcel as shown on an approved final subdivision map, arrange for (i) lien and completion bond or bonds in an amount sufficient to assure lien-free completion of all common area improvements not located in a residential structure, and (ii) placement of all funds, or such portions thereof as the commissioner shall determine are sufficient, from the sales of condominium interests in a neutral escrow depository acceptable to the
 commissioner. The funds for purchase or lease of the condominium interest shall remain in the escrow account until the residential structure in which the purchaser’s separate unit is located has been completed, and all lien periods applicable to the purchaser’s separate and undivided interests in the entire project arising out of the work of improvement performed by either the subdivider or any successor in interest to the subdivider have expired or have been insured against in a manner satisfactory to the commissioner.

(E) Such other alternative plan as may be approved by the commissioner.

(b) The deeds, conveyances, leases, subleases, or instruments or assignment to be used are adequate to transfer to the purchasers the legal interests and uses which the owner or subdivider represents the purchasers will receive.

(c) After transfer of title to the first lot, apartment, or condominium in the subdivision to any purchaser, the provisions of the declaration of restrictions, articles of incorporation, bylaws, management contracts (and the provisions of any and all other documents establishing, in whole or in part, the plan for use, enjoyment, maintenance, and preservation of the subdivision) as last submitted to the commissioner prior to issuance of the final public report, shall be binding upon the purchaser and occupant of every other lot, apartment, or condominium in the subdivision, including, except with regard to a limited-equity housing cooperative, purchasers acquiring title by foreclosure, whether judicial or nonjudicial, or by deed in lieu thereof, under any mortgage or deed of trust, whether or not the mortgage or deed of trust was recorded prior to recordation of the covenants, conditions and restrictions applicable to the first lot, apartment, or condominium.

(d) Reasonable arrangements have been made for delivery of control over the subdivision and all offsite land and improvements included in the offering, to the purchasers of lots, apartments, or condominiums in the subdivision.

(e) Reasonable arrangements have been or will be made as to the interest of each of the purchasers of lots, apartments, or condominiums in the subdivision with respect to the management, maintenance, preservation, operation, use, right of resale, and control of their lots, apartments, or condominiums, and such other areas or interests, whether or not within, or pertaining to, areas within the boundaries of the subdivision, as have been or will be made subject to the plan of control proposed by the owner and subdivider, and which are included in the offering.

“Purchaser,” as used in this section, shall include within
 its meaning a lessee of the legal interests described in Section 11003 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

11018.6.

Any person offering to sell or lease any interest subject to the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section
 11018.1 in a subdivision described in Section 11004.5 shall make a copy of each of the following documents available for examination by a prospective purchaser or lessee before the execution of an offer to purchase or lease and shall give a copy thereof to each purchaser or lessee as soon as practicable before transfer of the interest being acquired by the purchaser or lessee:

(a) The declaration of covenants, conditions, and restrictions for the subdivision.

(b) Articles of incorporation or association for the subdivision owners association.

(c) Bylaws for the subdivision owners association.

(d) Any other instrument which establishes or defines the common, mutual, and reciprocal rights, and responsibilities of the owners or lessees of interests in the
 subdivision as shareholders or members of the subdivision owners association or otherwise.

(e) To the extent available, the current financial information and related statements as specified in Sections 5300 and 5565 of the Civil Code, for subdivisions subject to those provisions.

(f) A statement prepared by the governing body of the association setting forth the outstanding delinquent assessments and related charges levied by the association against the subdivision interests in question under authority of the governing instruments for the subdivision and association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 181, Sec. 11.   (AB 806)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 86 of Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------

11018.7.

(a) No amendment or modification of provisions in the declaration of restrictions, bylaws, articles of incorporation or other instruments controlling or otherwise affecting rights to ownership, possession, or use of interests in subdivisions as defined in Sections 11000.1 and 11004.5 that would materially change those rights of an owner, either directly or as a member of an association of owners, is valid without the prior written consent of the Real Estate Commissioner during the period of time when the subdivider or their successor in interest holds or directly controls as many as one-fourth of the votes that may be cast to effect that change.

(b) The commissioner shall not grant their consent to the submission of the
 proposed change to a vote of owners or members if they find that the change if effected would create a new condition or circumstance that would form the basis for denial of a public report under Sections 11018 or 11018.5.

An application for consent may be filed by any interested person on a form prescribed by the commissioner. A filing fee of fifty dollars ($50), that may be modified by regulation, but not to exceed sixty-five dollars ($65), shall accompany each application.

There shall be no official meeting of owners or members nor any written solicitation of them for the purpose of effectuating a change referred to herein except in accordance with a procedure approved by the commissioner after the application for consent has been filed with the commissioner; provided, however, that the governing body of the owners association may meet and vote on the question of submission of the proposed change to the
 commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 41, Sec. 16.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11018.12.

(a) The commissioner may issue a conditional public report for a subdivision specified in Section 11004.5 if the requirements of subdivision (e) are met, all deficiencies and substantive inadequacies in the documents that are required to make an application for a final public report for the subdivision substantially complete have been corrected, the material elements of the setup of the offering to be made under the authority of the conditional public report have been established, and all requirements for the issuance of a public report set forth in the regulations of the commissioner have been satisfied, except for one or more of the following requirements, as applicable:

(1) A final map has not been recorded.

(2) A condominium plan pursuant to Section 4120 of the Civil Code has not been recorded.

(3) A declaration of covenants, conditions, and restrictions pursuant to Sections 4250 and 4255 of the Civil Code has not been recorded.

(4) A declaration of annexation has not been recorded.

(5) A recorded subordination of existing liens to the declaration of covenants, conditions, and restrictions or declaration of annexation, or escrow instructions to effect recordation prior to the first sale, are lacking.

(6) Filed articles of incorporation are lacking.

(7) A current preliminary report of a licensed title insurance company issued after filing of the final map and recording of the declaration covering all subdivision interests to be included in the public report has not been provided.

(8) Other requirements the commissioner determines are likely to be timely satisfied by the applicant, notwithstanding the fact that the failure to meet these requirements makes the application qualitatively incomplete.

(b) The commissioner may issue a conditional public report for a subdivision not referred to or specified in Section 11000.1 or 11004.5 if the requirements of subdivision (e) are met, all deficiencies and substantive inadequacies in the documents that are required to make an application for a final public report for the subdivision substantially complete have been corrected, the material elements of the setup of the offering to be made under the authority of the conditional public report have been established, and all requirements for issuance of a public report set forth in the regulations of the commissioner have been satisfied, except for one or more of the
 following requirements, as applicable:

(1) A final map has not been recorded.

(2) A declaration of covenants, conditions, and restrictions has not been recorded.

(3) A current preliminary report of a licensed title insurance company issued after filing of the final map and recording of the declaration covering all subdivision interests to be included in the public report has not been provided.

(4) Other requirements the commissioner determines are likely to be timely satisfied by the applicant, notwithstanding the fact that the failure to meet these requirements makes the application qualitatively incomplete.

(c) A decision by the commissioner to not issue a conditional public report shall
 be noticed in writing to the applicant within five business days and that notice shall specifically state the reasons why the report is not being issued.

(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 11018.2, a person may sell or lease, or offer for sale or lease, lots or parcels in a subdivision pursuant to a conditional public report if, as a condition of the sale or lease or offer for sale or lease, delivery of legal title or other interest contracted for will not take place until issuance of a public report and provided that the requirements of subdivision (e) are met.
